Vermont statutes. Title 26 Professions and Occupations
Subchapter 1. General Provisions

§ 1051.
Purpose and effect.

In order to safeguard the life and health of the people of this State, no person shall practice, or offer to practice, property inspecting unless currently licensed under this chapter.

HISTORY:

Added

2013, No. 136

(Adj. Sess.), § 2.

§ 1052.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

“Director” means the Director of the Office of Professional Regulation.

“License” means a current authorization granted by the Director permitting the practice of property inspecting.

“Practice of property inspecting” means performing or offering to perform for the public for a fee or other compensation services involving the physical inspection of real property structures and other improvements in order to evaluate the condition of the property, including any safety issues or material defects.

“Property inspector” means a person who is licensed under this chapter to engage in the practice of property inspecting.

HISTORY:

Added

2013, No. 136

(Adj. Sess.), § 2.

§ 1053.
Prohibitions; offenses.

It shall be a violation of this chapter for any person to:

sell or fraudulently obtain or furnish any property inspector degree, diploma, certificate of registration, license, or any other related document or record or to aid or abet in so doing;

practice property inspecting under cover of any degree, diploma, registration, license, or related document or record illegally or fraudulently obtained or signed or issued unlawfully or under fraudulent representation;

practice property inspecting unless currently licensed to do so under the provisions of this chapter;

represent himself or herself as being licensed by this State to practice property inspecting or use in connection with a name any words, letters, signs, or figures that imply that a person is a property inspector when not licensed or otherwise authorized under this chapter; or

practice property inspecting during the time a license or authorization issued under this chapter is suspended or revoked.

Any person violating this section shall be subject to the penalties provided in

3 V.S.A. § 127

.

HISTORY:

Added

2013, No. 136

(Adj. Sess.), § 2.

§ 1054.
Exceptions.

This chapter does not prohibit:

the practice of property inspection that is incidental to his or her program of study by a person enrolled in a property inspection training program approved by the Director; or

the practice of any other occupation or profession by a person duly licensed or otherwise authorized under the laws of this State.

HISTORY:

Added

2013, No. 136

(Adj. Sess.), § 2.